Maryland, session 2025, SB0113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
2–202.
(a) The State Board consists of [13] 14 regular members, and 1 student member,
appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate.
(b) (1) In making appointments to the State Board, the Governor shall
consider representation from:
(i) All parts of this State; and
(ii) Areas of this State with concentrations of population or unique
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0113*

SENATE BILL 113
needs.
(2) Except as provided in paragraphs (4) through [(6)] (7) of this
subsection, the members of the Board shall be appointed from the general public.
(3) The following individuals may not be appointed to the Board:
(i) Except for the teacher member, PRINCIPAL MEMBER, and
student member, any individual who is subject to the authority of the Board;
(ii) The Governor; and
(iii) The State Superintendent.
(4) (i) Of the [13] 14 regular members of the State Board, one regular
member shall be a certified teacher who is actively teaching.
(ii) The Governor shall appoint the teacher member, with the advice
and consent of the Senate, who received the highest number of votes after an election by
teachers in the State.
(iii) The Department shall provide notice of a teacher member
vacancy on the State Board to:
1. All certified teachers who are actively teaching in the
State; and
2. All teachers’ organizations representing teachers in the
State for purposes of collective bargaining.
(iv) 1. The election shall be conducted under regulations that the
Department adopts.
2. The Department may consult with the State Retirement
Agency of the Maryland State Retirement and Pension System to conduct the election
required under this subparagraph.
(v) The teacher member may attend and participate in an executive
session of the State Board.
(vi) The teacher member may not vote on any matter that relates to
appeals to the State Board under § 6–202 of this article.
(5) (I) OF THE 14 REGULAR MEMBERS OF THE STATE BOARD, ONE
REGULAR MEMBER SHALL BE A CERTIFIED PRINCIPAL WHO IS ACTIVELY LEADING A
SCHOOL.

SENATE BILL 113 3
(II) THE GOVERNOR SHALL APPOINT THE PRINCIPAL MEMBER,
WITH THE ADVICE AND CONSENT OF THE SENATE, WHO RECEIVED THE HIGHEST
NUMBER OF VOTES AFTER AN ELECTION BY PRINCIPALS IN THE STATE.
(III) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE OF A
PRINCIPAL MEMBER VACANCY ON THE STATE BOARD TO ALL CERTIFIED
PRINCIPALS IN THE STATE.
(IV) THE ELECTION SHALL BE CONDUCTED UNDER
REGULATIONS THAT THE DEPARTMENT ADOPTS.
(V) THE PRINCIPAL MEMBER MAY ATTEND AND PARTICIPATE IN
AN EXECUTIVE SESSION OF THE STATE BOARD.
(VI) THE PRINCIPAL MEMBER MAY NOT VOTE ON ANY MATTER
THAT RELATES TO APPEALS TO THE STATE BOARD UNDER § 6–202 OF THIS ARTICLE.
[(5)] (6) (i) Of the [13] 14 regular members of the State Board, one
regular member shall be the parent of a student enrolled in a public school in the State.
(ii) The Governor shall appoint the parent member, with the advice
and consent of the Senate, from a list of three qualified individuals submitted to the
Governor by the Maryland PTA.
(iii) The Department shall provide notice of the parent member
vacancy on the State Board to the Maryland PTA.
(iv) The parent member may attend and participate in an executive
session of the State Board.
[(6)] (7) The student member shall be selected by the Governor from a list
of 2 persons nominated by the Maryland Association of Student Councils.
(c) (1) The student member shall be:
(i) A regularly enrolled student; and
(ii) In good standing in a public high school in the State.
(2) The student member may attend and participate in an executive
session of the Board.
(3) The student member may not vote on any matter that relates to:

SENATE BILL 113
(i) The dismissal of or other disciplinary action involving personnel;
or
(ii) Appeals to the State Board under § 2–205 of this subtitle or §
4–205 or § 6–202 of this article.
(d) (1) Each regular member serves for a term of 4 years and until a successor
is appointed and qualifies. These terms are staggered as required by the terms of the
members serving on the State Board as of July 1, 1989.
(2) The Governor shall appoint a new member to fill any vacancy on the
Board for the remainder of that term and until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
(3) A member is eligible for reappointment but may not serve for more than
two full 4–year terms.
(4) The student member shall serve for a term of 1 year. A student member
is eligible for reappointment but may not serve more than two full 1–year terms.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Governor shall appoint,
in accordance with § 2–202(b)(5) of the Education Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this
Act, the initial principal member of the State Board of Education, who shall serve for a
term beginning July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.